Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-442
Partner's power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to section 67-443, a partnership is bound by a partner's act after dissolution that:

(1) Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

(2) Would have bound the partnership under section 67-413 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 42.